Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1877.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature recognizes that streamlining or eliminating offices, agencies, programs, and services within the public education system that do not include direct daily interaction with students will result in significant financial savings and reduction in time-consuming mandates and operations that do not sufficiently enhance the basic education and academic outcomes of Washington state's public school students. While streamlined and eliminated offices, agencies, programs, and services may have provided some contribution to the public education system, the legislature finds that the cost and efficacy of these offices, agencies, programs, and services are at best ancillary to the provision of basic education. To the extent any offices, agencies, programs, or services streamlined or eliminated include functions that directly provide basic education to public school students, the legislature intends for those functions to be reconstituted and relocated within existing facilities where direct, daily interaction with students will occur.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 43.09 RCW to read as follows:(1) By November 1, 2025, the state auditor shall identify all offices, agencies, subsets of agencies, programs, and services that do not include direct, daily interaction with public school students during the school year. On December 31, 2025, all identified offices, agencies, subsets of agencies, programs, and services shall be dissolved.(2) For the purposes of this section, "public schools" has the same meaning as in RCW 28A.150.010.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. Nothing in this act shall be construed as eliminating the constitutionally required position of the superintendent of public instruction.--- END ---